Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.362

Temporary orders to surrender and prohibit weapons—Period for reconsideration or revision.

(1) The legislature recognizes the inherent volatility and danger associated with domestic violence, particularly when the court has made a finding that an ex parte order to surrender and prohibit weapons is necessary. The risk of domestic violence homicide is most acute when a victim is ending the relationship and throughout legal proceedings. The presence of a firearm in a domestic violence situation increases the risk of homicide by 11 times. The legislature acknowledges the potential for judicial or administrative error in hearings on full protection orders and the significant consequences that can result from such errors. In recognition of the potential for error, the legislature has previously established in RCW 2.24.050 that decisions of court commissioners are subject to revision and the courts have created processes for reconsideration of rulings. Therefore, in any proceeding in which the court enters a temporary protection order that includes a temporary order to surrender and prohibit weapons, and after the hearing the court denies the petition for a full protection order, the order to surrender and prohibit weapons must remain in effect until the period for a petitioner to file a motion for reconsideration or revision has passed. If a motion for reconsideration or revision is filed, the order to surrender and prohibit weapons must remain in effect until the motion for reconsideration or revision is resolved.

(2) At the hearing in which the court denies the petition for a full protection order, if the petitioner is present, the court must notify the petitioner verbally of the procedures and timelines for filing a motion for reconsideration or a motion for revision. The court must provide the petitioner with written information explaining the procedures and timelines for filing a motion for reconsideration or a motion for revision. The information must also include contact information for civil legal aid organizations that may assist the petitioner with a motion for reconsideration or a motion for revision.

(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply if allowing the order to surrender and prohibit weapons to remain in effect would be manifestly unjust including, but not limited to, situations where the court finds the temporary protection order was entirely without merit, the petitioner was engaged in abusive use of litigation, or the petitioner was exerting coercive control, as defined in RCW 7.105.010, over the respondent.

[ 2023 c 462 s 203.]